Washington statutes.
RCW 15.53.9024

Inspections of facilities, vehicles, equipment, etc.—Verification of records and procedures—Notice—Official samples—Warrants authorized.

(1) For the purpose of enforcement of this chapter, and in order to determine whether its provisions have been complied with, including whether an operation is subject to such provisions, inspectors duly designated by the director, upon presenting appropriate credentials, and a written notice to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, are authorized (a) to enter, during normal business hours, any facility within the state in which commercial feeds are manufactured, transloaded, processed, packed, distributed, or held for distribution, or to enter a vehicle being used to transport or hold such feeds; and (b) to inspect at reasonable times and within reasonable limits and in a reasonable manner, the facilities, or vehicles and all pertinent equipment, finished and unfinished materials, containers, labeling, and records. The inspection may include the verification of only such records, and production and control procedures as may be necessary to determine compliance with this chapter and its rules.

(2) A separate notice shall be given for each such inspection, but a notice is not required for each entry made during the period covered by the inspection. Each such inspection shall be commenced and completed with reasonable promptness. Upon completion of the inspection, the person in charge of the facility or vehicle shall be so notified.

(3) If the inspector or employee making such inspection of a facility or vehicle has obtained a sample in the course of the inspection, upon completion of the inspection and prior to leaving the premises, he or she shall give to the owner, operator, or agent in charge, a receipt describing the samples obtained.

(4) If the owner of a facility or vehicle described in subsection (1) of this section, or his or her agent, refuses to admit the director or his or her agent to inspect in accordance with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the director or his or her agent is authorized to obtain from any court of competent jurisdiction a warrant directing such owner or his or her agent to submit the premises described in the warrant to inspection.

(5) For the enforcement of this chapter, the director or his or her duly assigned agent is authorized to enter upon any public or private premises including any vehicle of transport during regular business hours to have access to, and to obtain samples, and to examine records relating to distribution of commercial feeds.

(6) Sampling and analysis shall be conducted in accordance with methods published by the association of official analytical chemists, or in accordance with other generally recognized methods.

(7) The results of all analyses of official samples shall be forwarded by the department to the person named on the label and to the purchaser, if known. If the inspection and analysis of an official sample indicates a commercial feed has been adulterated or misbranded and upon request within thirty days following the receipt of the analysis, the department shall furnish to the registrant or licensee a portion of the sample concerned. If referee analysis is requested, a portion of the official sample shall be furnished by the department and shall be sent directly to an independent lab agreed to by all parties.

(8) The department, in determining for administrative purposes whether a feed is deficient in any component, shall be guided solely by the official sample as defined in RCW 15.53.901(20) and obtained and analyzed as provided for in this section.

(9) Analysis of an official sample by the department shall be accepted as prima facie evidence by any court of competent jurisdiction.

[ 2005 c 18 s 8; 1995 c 374 s 41; 1965 ex.s. c 31 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Prosecutions, official analysis as evidence: RCW 15.53.904.